Mississippi, session 2026, SB2496.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 1, Chapter 431, Laws of 2024, is amended as follows: Section 1.  (1)  There is hereby established the "Mississippi K-12 and Postsecondary Mental Health Task Force," created to address growing concerns related to student mental health.  The goal of the task force shall include, but not be limited to, drawing on available data to determine challenges in Mississippi as it relates to the mental health of students ranging from K-12 through the community college and university systems; assessing  public and private resources currently available to students who need help managing mental health issues; assessing training and procedures in place for teachers, school district personnel and community college and university personnel; and determining where gaps exist in training and resources; exploring partnerships across communities to better serve students; and examining successful programs in Mississippi and across the nation.  The task force shall develop recommendations to the Legislature on changes to policy and laws in Mississippi with a goal of better identifying students at all levels struggling with mental health issues; training school, community college and university personnel related to student mental health, and thus improving health outcomes and the probability of student success. (2)  The members of the task force shall be as follows: (a)  The Chairmen of the Education Committees of the Mississippi Senate and the Mississippi House of Representatives, or their designees from their respective committee membership; (b)  The Chairmen of the Medicaid Committees of the Mississippi Senate and the Mississippi House of Representatives, or their designees from their respective committee membership; (c)  The Chairmen of the Universities and Colleges Committees of the Mississippi Senate and the Mississippi House of Representatives, or their designees from their respective committee membership; (d)  The Superintendent of the Mississippi Department of Education, or his or her designee; (e)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Mental Health, or his or her designee; (f)  The Director of the Mississippi Division of Medicaid, or his or her designee; (g)  The State Health Officer of the Mississippi Department of Health, or his or her designee; (h)  One (1) psychiatrist with expertise in treating children to be appointed by the Governor; (i)  One (1) clinical psychologist with expertise in treating children appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; (j)  One (1) school psychologist employed or contracted by a Mississippi Public School District, to be named by the Mississippi Association of Psychologists in the Schools; (k)  One (1) public school teacher appointed by the Governor; (l)  One (1) employee of a university counseling center, or a person otherwise responsible for coordinating or providing student mental health services on campus, appointed by the Governor; (m)  One (1) public school counselor appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; (n)  One (1) employee of a community college counseling center, or a person responsible for coordinating or providing student mental health services on campus, appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; (o)  One (1) school nurse employed in a Mississippi public school to be appointed by the Superintendent of Education; (p)  One (1) employee of a non-profit provider of mental and behavioral health services to youth, appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; (q)  One (1) employee of a community mental health provider that provides services to a Mississippi public school * * * school, appointed by the Governor; (r)  One (1) member of the Mississippi Youth Council, selected by the members of the council; (s)  One (1) family advocacy representative to be appointed by the Executive Director of the Mississippi Coalition for Citizens with Disabilities; and (t)  The Chairmen of the Public Health Committees of the Mississippi Senate and the Mississippi House of Representatives, or their designees from their respective committee membership. (3)  The task force shall meet within forty-five (45) days of the effective date of this act and shall evaluate the current data, resources, and laws and policies of the State of Mississippi.  Specifically, the task force shall: (a)  Collect and analyze publicly available data and statistics related to the current state of student mental health, K-12 through the community college and university level; (b)  Explore the impact of trauma and mental health issues on student behavior, dropout and graduation rates, academic achievement, employment and related issues; (c)  Evaluate currently available resources for addressing student mental health including, but not limited to, partnerships with nonprofits or experts, telehealth opportunities, inpatient and outpatient resources; (d)  Review mental health training and professional development provided to K-12 school personnel and school personnel at community colleges and universities for classroom management, identification, referral, intervention and prevention; (e)  Evaluate successful strategies for addressing challenges in student mental health in Mississippi and across the nation; (f) Review the current workforce landscapes as it relates to psychologists, nurses, counselors, behavior interventionists and others who work in schools, community colleges and universities, and consider strategies to recruit sufficient personnel if there are workforce strategies; (g)  Explore the effect of a multi-tiered wellness program that is conducive to growth, achievement, cultivating resilience, motivation and culturally sensitive personal development; and (h)  Review any other matters related to the above issues or student mental health in Mississippi. (4)  The task force may request the assistance of the Mississippi Department of Education, Mississippi Community College Board, Mississippi Institutions of Higher Learning, Mississippi Department of Health, the Mississippi Department of Mental Health, the University of Mississippi School of Medicine; the Mississippi Division of Medicaid or any other related agency, entity or organization with expertise in student mental health issues and services. (5)  The Chairmen of the Education Committees in the Mississippi Senate and Mississippi House of Representatives shall call the first meeting.  The members of the task force shall elect a chair from among the members at its first meeting.  The task force shall develop and report its findings and recommendations to the Mississippi Legislature on or before October 1, 2024, and again on or before October 1, 2026.  A majority of the membership shall be required to approve any final report and recommendation.  Meetings of the task force shall be held at the State Capitol; however, if it is not feasible for the task force to hold an in-person meeting, the task force may convene utilizing an online meeting platform that is accessible for viewing by the public. (6)  The Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review shall provide necessary clerical support for the meetings of the task force and the preparation of the report. (7)  The task force shall be dissolved upon presentation of its report due on or before October 1, 2026. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.